District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.25

Licenses and certifications issued prior to this subchapter.

Any person who has been properly licensed or certified under any prior law or regulation of the District, has a valid license or certificate, and on the effective date of this subchapter is in the active practice of the occupation or profession for which he or she has been licensed or certified shall be deemed qualified to practice that occupation or profession, notwithstanding that such person does not meet the qualifications for licensure or certification set forth in this subchapter. The person shall be eligible to renew that license or certificate and continue to practice that occupation or profession as long as all current requirements for licensure or certification are met and unless disciplined as provided in this subchapter.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.25.